North Carolina, session 2025, HB175.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 6 of Article XIV of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 6. Marriage.
Marriage between one man and one woman is the only domestic legal union that shall be
valid or recognized in this State. This section does not prohibit a private party from entering into
contracts with another private party; nor does this section prohibit courts from adjudicating the
rights of private parties pursuant to such contracts."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at the general election in November 2026, which election shall
be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots, voting systems, or
both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The question to be
used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment to repeal a constitutional provision that recognizes
marriage between one man and one woman as the only domestic legal union that is valid and
recognized in this State."
SECTION 3. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1 of this act, the State Board of Elections shall certify the amendment to the
Secretary of State, and the amendment becomes effective January 1, 2027. The Secretary of State
shall enroll the amendment so certified among the permanent records of that office.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*H175-v-1*